Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.030

Purpose.

The legislature finds that the need for long-range state program planning and for the short-range planning carried on through the budget process, complement each other. The biennial budget submitted to the legislature must be considered in the light of the longer-range plans and goals of the state. The effectiveness of the short-range plan presented as budget proposals, cannot be measured without being aware of these longer-range goals. Thus efficient management requires that the planning and fiscal activities of state government be integrated into a unified process. It is the purpose of this chapter to bring these functions together in a new division of the office of the governor to be called the office of financial management.

[ 1979 c 151 s 109; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 1.]